Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 19
SCHOOL BUS REQUIREMENTS

42-4-1901. School buses - equipped with supplementary brake retarders.

On and after July 1, 1991, except as provided in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, passengers of any school bus being used on mountainous terrain by any school district of the state shall not occupy the front row of seats and any seats located next to the emergency doors of such school bus during the period of such use.

For purposes of this section, mountainous terrain shall include, but shall not be limited to, any road or street which the department of transportation has designated as being located on mountainous terrain.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:

Passengers of any school bus which is equipped with retarders of appropriate capacity for purposes of supplementing any service brake systems of such school bus; or

Any passenger who is adequately restrained in a fixed position pursuant to federal and state standards.

The general assembly encourages school districts to consider installing only electromagnetic retarders or state-of-the-art retarders for purposes of supplementing service brake systems of school buses when such retarders are acquired on or after April 17, 1991. The general assembly also encourages school districts to consider purchasing only those new school buses which are equipped with external public address systems and retarders of appropriate capacity for purposes of supplementing any service brake systems of such school buses.

For purposes of this section and section 42-4-1902:

"Mountainous terrain" means that condition where longitudinal and transverse changes in the elevation of the ground with respect to a road or street are abrupt and where benching and sidehill excavation are frequently required to obtain acceptable horizontal and vertical alignment.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2435, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(b) amended, p. 960, § 19, effective May 25.

L. 2010:

(3)(b) repealed, (HB 10-1232), ch. 163, p. 573, § 14, effective April 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-238 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1902. School vehicle drivers - special training required.

On and after July 1, 1992, the driver of any school vehicle as defined in section 42-1-102 (88.5) owned or operated by or for any school district in this state shall have successfully completed training, approved by the department of education, concerning driving on mountainous terrain, as defined in section 42-4-1901 (3)(a), and driving in adverse weather conditions.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2436, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1232), ch. 163, p. 573, § 15, effective April 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-239 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1903. School buses - stops - signs - passing.

The driver of a motor vehicle upon any highway, road, or street, upon meeting or overtaking from either direction any school bus that has stopped, shall stop the vehicle at least twenty feet before reaching the school bus if visual signal lights as specified in subsection (2) of this section have been actuated on the school bus. The driver shall not proceed until the visual signal lights are no longer being actuated. The driver of a motor vehicle shall stop when a school bus that is not required to be equipped with visual signal lights by subsection (2) of this section stops to receive or discharge schoolchildren.

A driver of any school bus who observes a violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall notify the driver's school district transportation dispatcher. The school bus driver shall provide the school district transportation dispatcher with the color, basic description, and license plate number of the vehicle involved in the violation, information pertaining to the identity of the alleged violator, and the time and the approximate location at which the violation occurred. Any school district transportation dispatcher who has received information by a school bus driver concerning a violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall provide such information to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies.

A law enforcement agency may issue a citation on the basis of the information supplied to it pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) to the driver of the vehicle involved in the violation.

Every school bus as defined in section 42-1-102 (88), other than a small passenger-type vehicle having a seating capacity of not more than fifteen, used for the transportation of schoolchildren shall:

(I) Bear upon the front and rear of such school bus plainly visible and legible signs containing the words "SCHOOL BUS" in letters not less than eight inches in height; and

(II) Display eight visual signal lights meeting the requirements of 49 CFR 571.108 or its successor regulation.

The red visual signal lights shall be actuated by the driver of the school bus whenever the school bus is stopped for the purpose of receiving or discharging schoolchildren, is stopped because it is behind another school bus that is receiving or discharging passengers, or, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, is stopped because it has met a school bus traveling in a different direction that is receiving or discharging passengers and at no other time; but such lights need not be actuated when a school bus is stopped at locations where the local traffic regulatory authority has by prior written designation declared such actuation unnecessary.

A school bus shall be exempt from the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) when stopped for the purpose of discharging or loading passengers who require the assistance of a lift device only when no passenger is required to cross the roadway. Such buses shall stop as far to the right off the roadway as possible to reduce obstruction to traffic.

The alternating flashing yellow lights shall be actuated at least two hundred feet prior to the point where the bus is to be stopped for the purpose of receiving or discharging schoolchildren, and the red lights shall be actuated only at the time the bus is actually stopped.

Every school bus used for the transportation of schoolchildren, except those small passenger-type vehicles described in subsection (1) of this section, shall be equipped with school bus pedestrian safety devices that comply with 49 CFR 571.131 or its successor regulation.

The driver of a vehicle upon a highway with separate roadways need not stop upon meeting or passing a school bus which is on a different roadway. For the purposes of this section, "highway with separate roadways" means a highway that is divided into two or more roadways by a depressed, raised, or painted median or other intervening space serving as a clearly indicated dividing section or island.

Every school bus shall stop as far to the right of the roadway as possible before discharging or loading passengers; except that the school bus may block the lane of traffic when a passenger being received or discharged is required to cross the roadway. When possible, a school bus shall not stop where the visibility is obscured for a distance of two hundred feet either way from the bus. The driver of a school bus that has stopped shall allow time for any vehicles that have stopped behind the school bus to pass the school bus, if such passing is legally permissible where the school bus is stopped, after the visual signal lights, if any, are no longer being displayed or actuated and after all children who have embarked or disembarked from the bus are safe from traffic.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (6), any person who violates any provision of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense if such person has been convicted within the previous five years of a violation of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in the case of public transportation programs for pupil transportation under section 22-51-104 (1)(c), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2436, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(a), (2)(b)(II), and (5) amended, p. 960, § 20, effective May 25.

L. 97:

(2)(a), (2)(b)(I), (2)(c), (3), and (5) amended, p. 1387, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(b)(I) and (5) amended, p. 100, § 1, effective March 23.

L. 2008:

(2)(a)(II) and (3) amended, p. 373, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 09-1236), ch. 86, p. 312, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-612 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For penalties for class 1 and class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

42-4-1904. Regulations for school buses - regulations on discharge of passengers - penalty - exception.

The state board of education, by and with the advice of the executive director of the department, shall adopt and enforce regulations not inconsistent with this article to govern the operation of all school buses used for the transportation of schoolchildren and to govern the discharge of passengers from such school buses. Such regulations shall prohibit the driver of any school bus used for the transportation of schoolchildren from discharging any passenger from the school bus which will result in the passenger's immediately crossing a major thoroughfare, except for two-lane highways when such crossing can be done in a safe manner, as determined by the local school board in consultation with the local traffic regulatory authority, and shall prohibit the discharging or loading of passengers from the school bus onto the side of any major thoroughfare whenever access to the destination of the passenger is possible by the use of a road or street which is adjacent to the major thoroughfare. For the purposes of this section, a "major thoroughfare" means a freeway, any U.S. highway outside any incorporated limit, interstate highway, or highway with four or more lanes, or a highway or road with a median separating multiple lanes of traffic. Every person operating a school bus or responsible for or in control of the operation of school buses shall be subject to said regulations.

Any person operating a school bus under contract with a school district who fails to comply with any of said regulations is guilty of breach of contract, and such contract shall be cancelled after notice and hearing by the responsible officers of such district.

Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in the case of public transportation programs for pupil transportation under section 22-51-104 (1)(c), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2438, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-613 as it existed prior to 1994.